Utah statutes.
26-1-21.   Disposal of property by department.
(1)  The department may dispose of any personal property owned by it or any of
the entities created under Section 26-1-13, in the manner provided in Title
63A, Chapter 9, Part 8, Surplus Property Service.
(2)  The department may dispose of any real property owned by it or any of the
entities created under Section 26-1-13, in the manner provided in Title 65A,
Chapter 4.
